fr: Type d’attache de la balle de paddle ball: Attache élastique (paddle ball classique); Sans attache (balle séparée); Attache en élastique; Attache en ficelle; Attache à ventouse; Autre
hr-HR: Vrsta pričvršćivanja za lopticu za veslo: Elastična traka (klasični paddle ball); Bez trake (zasebna loptica); Gumena traka; Traka od užeta; Traka s vakuumskom priljepnicom; Ostalo
ru: Тип крепления мяча к ракетке: Эластичный шнур (классический падлбол); Без шнура (отдельный мяч); Резиновый шнур; Шнурок; Крепление на присоске; Другое
sl-SI: Vrsta pritrjevanja žogice pri namiznem loparju: Elastična vrvica (klasičen paddle ball); Brez vrvice (ločena žogica); Vrvica iz gumice; Vrvica iz niti; Vrvica s priseskom; Drugo
tr: Raket topu bağlantı tipi: Elastik kordon (klasik raket topu); Kordonsuz (ayrı top); Lastik bantlı kordon; İp kordon; Vantuzlu kordon; Diğer
fi: Mailapelin kiinnitystyyppi: Joustava naru (klassinen paddle ball); Ei narua (erillinen pallo); Kuminauha; Narukiinnitys; Imukuppikiinnitys; Muu
zh-TW: 球拍玩具球體連接類型: 彈性繫繩 (經典球拍球); 無繫繩 (分離球); 橡皮筋繫繩; 細繩繫繩; 吸盤繫繩; 其他
ro-RO: Tip de atașare a mingii de paletă: Fir elastic (paletă cu bilă clasică); Fără fir (bilă separată); Fir de bandă de cauciuc; Fir de sfoară; Fir cu ventuză; Altele
sk-SK: Typ upevnenia lopty k pálke: Elastické lanko (klasický paddle ball); Bez lanka (samostatná loptička); Uchytenie na gumičku; Šnúrka; Lanko s prísavkou; Iné
hu: Lapátlabda rögzítési típusa: Rugalmas rögzítő (klasszikus paddle ball); Nincs rögzítő (különálló labda); Gumiszalagos rögzítő; Zsinóros rögzítő; Tapadókorongos rögzítő; Egyéb
en: Paddle ball attachment type: Elastic tether (classic paddle ball); No tether (separate ball); Rubber band tether; String tether; Suction cup tether; Other
nb: Type feste for padleball: Elastisk snor (klassisk paddleball); Ingen snor (separat ball); Gummistrikksnor; Snor; Sugekopp-snor; Annet
sv: Fästtyp för paddelboll: Elastisk lina (klassisk paddleboll); Ingen lina (separat boll); Gummibandslina; Snörlina; Sugkoppslina; Övrigt
cs: Typ uchycení míče na pádlo: Elastické poutko (klasický paddleball); Bez poutka (oddělený míček); Poutko s gumičkou; Poutko na provázku; Poutko s přísavkou; Jiné
th: ประเภทอุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับไม้พายลูกปิงปอง: สายรัดยืดหยุ่น (แพดเดิลบอลแบบคลาสสิก); ไม่มีสายรัด (ลูกบอลแยก); สายรัดยางยืด; สายรัดเชือก; สายรัดแบบถ้วยดูด; อื่นๆ
el: Τύπος σύνδεσης μπάλας κουπιού: Ελαστικό κορδόνι (κλασικό paddle ball); Χωρίς κορδόνι (ξεχωριστό μπαλάκι); Κορδόνι από λάστιχο; Κορδόνι από σπάγκο; Κορδόνι με βεντούζα; Άλλο
nl: Paddle ball bevestigingstype: Elastisch koord (klassieke paddleball); Geen koord (losse bal); Elastiekkoord; Touwtje; Zuignapkoord; Overig
pt-PT: Tipo de encaixe para raquete de voleibol: Fio elástico (raquete com bola clássica); Sem fio (bola separada); Fio de elástico; Fio de corda; Fio com ventosa; Outro
de: Befestigungsart des Paddelballs: Elastische Leine (klassisches Paddleball); Keine Leine (separater Ball); Gummiband-Leine; Schnurleine; Saugnapf-Leine; Sonstige
es: Tipo de unión de la pelota a la paleta: Correa elástica (paddle ball clásico); Sin correa (pelota separada); Correa de banda elástica; Correa de cuerda; Correa de ventosa; Otro
zh-CN: 桨球连接类型: 弹性系绳（经典板球）; 无系绳（单独的球）; 橡皮筋系绳; 细绳系绳; 吸盘系绳; 其他
pl: Typ mocowania piłki do paletki: Elastyczna linka (klasyczna piłka z paletką); Bez linki (oddzielna piłka); Linka z gumki; Linka ze sznurka; Linka z przyssawką; Inne
vi: Loại phụ kiện bóng vợt: Dây thun (bóng bàn chèo cổ điển); Không dây (bóng rời); Dây cao su; Dây thừng; Cốc hút; Khác
da: Paddlebolds fastgørelsestype: Elastisk snor (klassisk paddleball); Ingen snor (separat bold); Gummibåndssnor; Snor; Sugekopssnor; Andet
pt-BR: Bola com raquete tipo de fixação: Corda elástica (paddle ball clássico); Sem corda (bola separada); Corda de elástico; Corda de barbante; Corda com ventosa; Outro
it: Tipo di attacco per pallina da racchetta: Cavo elastico (classico paddle ball); Senza cavo (pallina separata); Cavo a elastico; Cavo a corda; Cavo a ventosa; Altro
ja: パドルボールアタッチメントタイプ: 伸縮テザー (クラシックパドルボール); テザーなし (ボール分離型); 輪ゴムテザー; ひもテザー; 吸盤テザー; その他
lt-LT: Paddle ball kamuoliuko tvirtinimo tipas: Elastinis pasaitas (klasikinis „paddle ball“); Be pasaito (atskiras kamuoliukas); Guminis pasaitas; Virvelės pasaitas; Pasaitas su siurbtuku; Kita
ko: 패들볼 부착 유형: 탄성 테더(클래식 패들 볼); 테더 없음(분리형 볼); 고무 밴드 테더; 스트링 테더; 흡착판 테더; 기타
bg-BG: Тип закрепване на топката за падъл: Еластична връзка (класическа топка с хилка); Без връзка (отделна топка); Връзка от ластик; Връзка от връв; Връзка с вендуза; Друго